Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.05, is amended to read: 326.05 QUALIFICATIONS OF BOARD MEMBERS. Each member of the board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be a resident of this state at the time of and throughout the member's appointment. Each member except the public members deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end have been engaged in the practice of the relevant profession for at least deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin fivenew text end years and shall have been in responsible charge of professional work requiring licensure as an architect, engineer, land surveyor, landscape architect, or geoscientist, or certification as an interior designer for at least deleted text begin fivedeleted text end new text begin twonew text end years. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.10, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance. The board shall on application therefor on a prescribed form, and upon payment of a fee prescribed by rule of the board, issue a license or certificate as an architect, engineer, land surveyor, landscape architect, geoscientist, or certified interior designer. A separate fee shall be paid for each profession licensed. (1) To any person deleted text begin over 25 years of age, who is of good moral character and repute,deleted text end new text begin who complies with the Rules of Professional Conduct established in rules by the boardnew text end and who has the experience and educational qualifications deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end the board by rule may prescribe. (2) To any person who holds an unexpired certificate of registration or license issued by proper authority in the District of Columbia, any state or territory of the United States, or any foreign country, in which the requirements for registration or licensure of architects, engineers, land surveyors, landscape architects, geoscientists, or certified interior designers, respectively, at the time of registration or licensure in the other jurisdiction, were deleted text begin equal, in the opinion of the board,deleted text end new text begin substantially equivalent as established in rules by the boardnew text end to those fixed by the board and by the laws of this state, and in which similar privileges are extended to the holders of certificates of registration or licensure issued by this state. The board may require such person to submit a certificate of technical qualification from the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards in the case of an architect, from the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying in the case of an engineer, from the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards in the case of a landscape architect, and from the National Council for Interior Design Qualification in the case of a certified interior designer. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.10, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Examination. deleted text begin The board, or a committee of the board, may subject any applicant for licensure or certification to such examinations as may be deemed necessary to establish qualifications. deleted text end deleted text begin In determining the qualifications of applicants, at least one member determining the qualifications must be licensed or certified in the same profession as that being evaluated. deleted text end new text begin An applicant for licensure or certification must provide evidence of passing the required examinations as prescribed by the board in rules. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.10, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Temporary military license. The board shall establish a temporary license in accordance with section 197.4552 for the practice of architecture, professional engineering, geosciences, land surveying, landscape architecture, and interior design. The fee for the temporary license under this subdivision for the practice of architecture, professional engineering, geosciences, land surveying, landscape architecture, or interior design is deleted text begin $132deleted text end new text begin $0new text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.111, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Cease and desist orders. (a) The board, or the complaint committee if authorized by the board, may issue and have served upon a person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the unauthorized practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, landscape architecture, geoscience, or the unauthorized use of the titles architect, professional engineer, land surveyor, landscape architect, professional geologist, professional soil scientist, certified interior designer, or violation of the statute, rule, or order. The order shall be calculated to give reasonable notice of the rights of the person to request a hearing and shall state the reasons for the entry of the order. (b) Service of the order is effective if the order is served on the person or counsel of record personally or by certified mail to the most recent address provided to the board for the person or counsel of record.new text begin Service of the order must be by first class United States mail, including certified United States mail, or overnight express mail service with the postage prepaid and addressed to the party at the party's last known address. Service by United States mail, including certified mail, is complete upon placing the order in the mail or otherwise delivering the order to the United States mail service. Service by overnight express mail service is complete upon delivering the order to an authorized agent of the express mail service.new text end (c) Unless otherwise agreed by the board, or the complaint committee if authorized by the board, and the person requesting the hearing, the hearing shall be held no later than 30 days after the request for the hearing is received by the board. (d) The administrative law judge shall issue a report within 30 days of the close of the contested case hearing record, notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, part 1400.8100, subpart 3. Within 30 days after receiving the report and any exceptions to it, the board shall issue a further order vacating, modifying, or making permanent the cease and desist orders as the facts require. (e) If no hearing is requested within 30 days of service of the order, the order becomes final and remains in effect until it is modified or vacated by the board. (f) If the person to whom a cease and desist order is issued fails to appear at the hearing after being duly notified, the person is in default and the proceeding may be determined against that person upon consideration of the cease and desist order, the allegations of which may be considered to be true. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.111, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Actions against applicants and licensees. (a) The board may, by order, deny, refuse to renew, suspend, temporarily suspend, or revoke the application, license, or certification of a person; censure or reprimand that person; condition or limit the person's practice; refuse to permit a person to sit for examination; or refuse to release the person's examination grades if the board finds that the order is in the public interest and the applicant, licensee, or certificate holder: (1) has violated a statute, rule, or order that the board has issued or is empowered to enforce; (2) has engaged in conduct or acts that are fraudulent, deceptive, or dishonest whether or not the conduct or acts relate to the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, landscape architecture, geoscience, or certified interior design, providing that the fraudulent, deceptive, or dishonest conduct or acts reflect adversely on the person's ability or fitness to engage in the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, landscape architecture, geoscience, or certified interior design; (3) has engaged in conduct or acts that are negligent or otherwise in violation of the standards established by Minnesota Rules, chapters 1800 and 1805, where the conduct or acts relate to the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, landscape architecture, geoscience, or use of the title certified interior designer; (4) has been convicted of or has pled guilty or nolo contendere to a felony, an element of which is dishonesty or fraud, whether or not the person admits guilt, or has been shown to have engaged in acts or practices tending to show that the applicant or licensee is incompetent or has engaged in conduct reflecting adversely on the person's ability or fitness to engage in the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, landscape architecture, geoscience, or use of the title certified interior designer; (5) employed fraud or deception in obtaining a certificate, license, renewal, or reinstatement or in passing all or a portion of the examination; (6) has had the person's architecture, engineering, land surveying, landscape architecture, geoscience, or interior design license, certificate, right to examine, or other similar authority revoked, suspended, canceled, limited, or not renewed for cause in any state, commonwealth, or territory of the United States, in the District of Columbia, or in any foreign country; (7) has had the person's right to practice before any federal, state, or other government agency revoked, suspended, canceled, limited, or not renewed; (8) failed to meet any requirement for the issuance or renewal of the person's license or certificate; (9) has attached the person's seal or signature to a plan, specification, report, plat, or other architectural, engineering, land surveying, landscape architectural, geoscientific, or interior design document not prepared by the person sealing or signing it or under that person's direct supervision; or (10) with respect to temporary suspension orders, has committed an act, engaged in conduct, or committed practices that may, or has in the opinion of the board, or the complaint committee if authorized by the board, resulted in an immediate threat to the public. (b) In lieu of or in addition to any remedy provided in paragraph (a), the board may require, as a condition of continued licensure, possession of certificate, termination of suspension, reinstatement of license or certificate, examination, or release of examination grades, that the person: (1) submit to a quality review of the person's ability, skills, or quality of work, conducted in such fashion and by such persons, entity, or entities as the board may require including, but not limited to, remedial education courses; and (2) complete to the satisfaction of the board such continuing professional education courses as the board may specify by rule. (c) Service of the order deleted text begin is effective if the order is served on the licensee, certificate holder, applicant, person, or counsel of record personally or by certified mail, to the most recent address provided to the board for the licensee, certificate holder, applicant, person, or counsel of record.deleted text end new text begin must be by first class United States mail, including certified United States mail, or overnight express mail service with the postage prepaid and addressed to the party at the party's last known address. Service by United States mail, including certified mail, is complete upon placing the order in the mail or otherwise delivering the order to the United States mail service. Service by overnight express mail service is complete upon delivering the order to an authorized agent of the express mail service. new text end The order shall state the reasons for the entry of the order. (d) All hearings required by this section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 14, except with respect to temporary suspension orders, as provided for in subdivision 5, paragraph (d). Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.111, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Procedure for temporary suspension of license or certificate. (a) When the board, or the complaint committee if authorized by the board, issues a temporary suspension order, the suspension is in effect upon service of a written order on the licensee or counsel of record, specifying the statute, rule, or order violated. The order remains in effect until the board issues a final order in the matter after a hearing or upon agreement between the board and the licensee. (b) Service of the order deleted text begin is effective if the order is served on the licensee or counsel of record personally or by certified mail, to the most recent address provided to the board for the licensee or counsel of record.deleted text end new text begin must be by first class United States mail, including certified United States mail, or overnight express mail service with postage prepaid and addressed to the party at the party's last known address. Service by United States mail, including certified mail, is complete upon placing the order in the mail or otherwise delivering the order to the United States mail service. Service by overnight express mail service is complete upon delivering the order to an authorized agent of the express mail service.new text end (c) The order shall set forth the rights to a hearing contained in this subdivision and shall state the reasons for the entry of the order. (d) Within ten days after service of the order, the licensee may request a hearing in writing. The board shall hold a hearing before its own members within five working days of receipt of a request for hearing on the sole issue of whether there is a reasonable basis to continue, modify, or lift the temporary suspension. This hearing is not subject to chapter 14. Evidence presented by the board or the licensee shall be in affidavit form only. The licensee or counsel of record may appear for oral argument. (e) Within five working days after the hearing, the board shall issue its order and, if the suspension is continued, schedule a contested case hearing within 30 days after issuance of the order. The administrative law judge shall issue a report within 30 days after closing of the contested case hearing record, notwithstanding the provisions of Minnesota Rules, part 1400.8100, subpart 3. The board shall issue a final order within 30 days after receipt of that report and any exceptions to it. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.111, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Actions against a person with a lapsed license or certificate. new text end new text begin If a person's license or certificate lapses; is surrendered, withdrawn, or terminated; or otherwise becomes ineffective; the board may institute a proceeding against the person under this subdivision within two years after the license or certificate was last effective and enter a revocation or suspension order as of the last date on which the license or certificate was in effect or impose a civil penalty as provided in subdivision 6. new text end